Ohio, session 136, SB254.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO: Section 1. That section 5.2281 of the Revised Code be amended to read as follows: Sec. 5.2281. The month of May is designated as "Better Hearing and Speech Month" to increase public awareness of communication disorders and to promote treatment to improve the quality of life of individuals who experience difficulty hearing, understanding, or speaking. The fourteenth day of May is designated as "Childhood Apraxia of Speech Awareness Day" to increase public awareness about childhood apraxia of speech and to support the goals of better hearing and speech month. The period beginning the thirteenth day of March and ending the fifteenth day month of April is designated as "Ohio Deaf History Month." Section 2. That existing section 5.2281 of the Revised Code is hereby repealed.